New Mexico, session 2026, HB150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 61-6-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 361, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "61-6-6. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Medical Practice Act: A. "approved postgraduate training program for physicians" means a program approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education, the American osteopathic association or other board-approved program; B. "board" means the New Mexico medical board; C. "collaboration" means [the process by which a licensed physician and a physician assistant jointly contribute to the health care and medical treatment of patients] a physician assistant's consultation with or referral to an appropriate physician or other health care practitioner as indicated by the physician assistant's education, competencies and experience, the patient's condition and the standard of care; provided that: (1) each collaborator performs actions that the collaborator is licensed or otherwise authorized to perform; and (2) collaboration shall not be construed to require the physical presence of [the] a licensed physician at the time and place services are rendered; D. "licensed physician" means a medical or osteopathic physician licensed under the Medical Practice Act to practice medicine in New Mexico; E. "licensee" or "health care practitioner" means a medical physician, osteopathic physician, physician assistant, polysomnographic technologist, anesthesiologist assistant, naturopathic doctor, podiatric physician or naprapath licensed by the board to practice in New Mexico; F. "medical college or school in good standing" for medical physicians means a board-approved medical college or school that has as high a standard as that required by the association of American medical colleges and the council on medical education of the American medical association; and for osteopathic physicians means a college of osteopathic medicine accredited by the commission of osteopathic college accreditation; G. "medical student" means a student enrolled in a board-approved medical college or school in good standing; H. "physician assistant" means a health care practitioner who is licensed by the board to practice as a physician assistant and who provides services to patients [with the supervision of or in collaboration with a licensed physician as set forth in rules promulgated by the board]; I. "resident" means a graduate of a medical college or school in good standing who is in training in a board-approved and accredited residency training program in a hospital or facility affiliated with an approved hospital and who has been appointed to the position of "resident" or "fellow" for the purpose of postgraduate medical training; J. "the practice of medicine" consists of: (1) advertising, holding out to the public or representing in any manner that one is authorized to practice medicine or to practice health care that is under the authority of the board in this state; (2) offering or undertaking to administer, dispense or prescribe a drug or medicine for the use of another person, except as authorized pursuant to a professional or occupational licensing statute set forth in Chapter 61 NMSA 1978; (3) offering or undertaking to give or administer, dispense or prescribe a drug or medicine for the use of another person, except as directed by a licensed physician; (4) offering or undertaking to perform an operation or procedure upon a person; (5) offering or undertaking to diagnose, correct or treat in any manner or by any means, methods, devices or instrumentalities any disease, illness, pain, wound, fracture, infirmity, deformity, defect or abnormal physical or mental condition of a person; (6) offering medical peer review, utilization review or diagnostic service of any kind that directly influences patient care, except as authorized pursuant to a professional or occupational licensing statute set forth in Chapter 61 NMSA 1978; or (7) acting as the representative or agent of a person in doing any of the things listed in this subsection; K. "the practice of medicine across state lines" means: (1) the rendering of a written or otherwise documented medical opinion concerning diagnosis or treatment of a patient within this state by a physician located outside this state as a result of transmission of individual patient data by electronic, telephonic or other means from within this state to the physician or the physician's agent; or (2) the rendering of treatment to a patient within this state by a physician located outside this state as a result of transmission of individual patient data by electronic, telephonic or other means from within this state to the physician or the physician's agent; L. "sexual contact" means touching the primary genital area, groin, anus, buttocks or breast of a patient or allowing a patient to touch another's primary genital area, groin, anus, buttocks or breast in a manner that is commonly recognized as outside the scope of acceptable medical or health care practice; M. "sexual penetration" means sexual intercourse, cunnilingus, fellatio or anal intercourse, whether or not there is any emission, or introducing any object into the genital or anal openings of another in a manner that is commonly recognized as outside the scope of acceptable medical or health care practice; and N. "United States" means the fifty states, its territories and possessions and the District of Columbia." SECTION 2. Section 61-6-19 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989, Chapter 269, Section 15, as amended) is amended to read: "61-6-19. FEES.-- A. Except as provided in Section 61-1-34 NMSA 1978, the board shall impose the following fees: (1) an application fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for licensure by endorsement as provided in Section 61-6-13 NMSA 1978; (2) an application fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for licensure by examination as provided in Section 61-6-11 NMSA 1978; (3) a triennial renewal fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500); (4) a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for placing a physician's license or a physician assistant's license on inactive status; (5) a late fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for physicians who renew their license within forty-five days after the required renewal date; (6) a late fee not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for physicians who renew their licenses between forty-six and ninety days after the required renewal date; (7) a reinstatement fee not to exceed seven hundred dollars ($700) for reinstatement of a revoked, suspended or inactive license; (8) a reasonable administrative fee for verification and duplication of license or registration and copying of records; (9) a reasonable publication fee for the purchase of a publication containing the names of all practitioners licensed under the Medical Practice Act; (10) an impaired physician fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for a three-year period; (11) an interim license fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); (12) a temporary license fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100); (13) a postgraduate training license fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) annually; (14) an application fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for physician assistants applying for initial licensure; (15) a licensure fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for physician assistants biennial license renewal; [and registration of supervising or collaborating licensed physician] (16) a late fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) for physician assistants who renew their licensure within forty-five days after the required renewal date; (17) a late fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for physician assistants who renew their licensure between forty-six and ninety days after the required renewal date; (18) a reinstatement fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for physician assistants who reinstate an expired license; (19) a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) annually for a physician supervising a clinical pharmacist; (20) an application and renewal fee for a telemedicine license not to exceed nine hundred dollars ($900); (21) a reasonable administrative fee, not to exceed the current cost of application and license or renewal for a license, that may be charged for reprocessing applications and renewals that include minor but significant errors and that would otherwise be subject to investigation and possible disciplinary action; and (22) a reasonable fee as established by the department of public safety for nationwide and statewide criminal history screening of applicants and licensees. B. All fees are nonrefundable and shall be used by the board to carry out its duties efficiently." SECTION 3. Section 61-6C-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2022, Chapter 39, Section 31) is amended to read: "61-6C-3. LICENSURE AS A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT--SCOPE OF PRACTICE--BIENNIAL REGISTRATION OF SUPERVISION--LICENSE RENEWAL--FEES.-- A. The board may license as a physician assistant a qualified person who has graduated from a physician assistant program accredited by the national accrediting body as established by rule of the board in accordance with the State Rules Act and has passed a physician assistant national certifying examination as established by rule. The board may also license as a physician assistant a person who passed the physician assistant national certifying examination administered by the national commission on certification of physician assistants prior to 1986. B. A person shall not perform, attempt to perform or hold the person's own self out as a physician assistant without first applying for and obtaining a license from the board. C. Physician assistants may prescribe, administer, dispense and distribute dangerous drugs other than controlled substances in Schedule I of the Controlled Substances Act pursuant to rules adopted by the board after consultation with the board of pharmacy if the prescribing, administering, dispensing and distributing are done with the supervision of a licensed physician or in collaboration with [a licensed physician] an appropriate health care practitioner. The distribution process shall comply with state laws concerning prescription packaging, labeling and recordkeeping requirements. D. A physician assistant shall perform only the acts and duties that are within the physician assistant's scope of practice. E. An applicant for licensure as a physician assistant shall complete application forms supplied by the board and shall pay a licensing fee as provided in Section 61-6-19 NMSA 1978. F. A physician assistant shall biennially submit proof of current certification by the national commission on certification of physician assistants or another certifying agency designated by the board. [and shall renew the license and registration of supervision of the physician assistant with the board] G. A physician assistant with fewer than four thousand hours of clinical practice experience in a particular practice specialty shall not practice medicine in that practice specialty until the physician assistant has established a supervising or collaborating relationship with a licensed physician or other appropriate health care practitioner in accordance with rules promulgated by the board. H. Each biennial renewal of licensure shall be accompanied by a fee as provided in Section 61-6-19 NMSA 1978." SECTION 4. Section 61-6C-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2017, Chapter 103, Section 6) is amended to read: "61-6C-6. PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT COLLABORATION WITH LICENSED PHYSICIANS--SCOPE OF PRACTICE--MEDICAL MALPRACTICE INSURANCE.-- A. A physician assistant may independently perform the acts and duties that are within the physician assistant's scope of practice [in collaboration with a licensed physician] if the physician assistant has: (1) completed [three years] four thousand hours of clinical practice as a physician assistant with the supervision of a licensed physician; and (2) complied with rules adopted by the board establishing qualifications for when a physician assistant may engage in the practice of medicine in collaboration with [a licensed physician] an appropriate health care practitioner. B. A physician assistant shall practice at the standard of care within the scope of the physician assistant's education, experience and competence. [B.] C. A physician assistant practicing in collaboration with [a licensed physician] an appropriate health care practitioner shall, at a minimum, maintain a policy of malpractice liability insurance that will qualify the physician assistant under the provisions of the Medical Malpractice Act." SECTION 5. Section 61-6C-8 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1973, Chapter 361, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "61-6C-8. SUPERVISING OR COLLABORATING LICENSED PHYSICIAN--RESPONSIBILITY--SUPERVISING PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT RESPONSIBILITY.-- A. As a condition of licensure, all physician assistants practicing in New Mexico who have fewer than four thousand hours of clinical experience as a physician assistant shall be supervised by a licensed physician or other appropriate health care practitioner. The physician assistant shall inform the board of the name of the licensed physician or other appropriate health care practitioner under whose supervision the physician assistant will practice. All supervising physicians or health care practitioners shall be licensed pursuant to the Medical Practice Act and approved by the board. B. Every licensed physician supervising a physician assistant shall be individually responsible and liable for the performance of the acts and omissions delegated to the physician assistant the physician supervises. Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the physician assistant of responsibility and liability for the acts and omissions of the physician assistant [rules promulgated in accordance with the State Rules Act pursuant to the Physician Assistant Act shall: (1) require that a physician assistant whose practice is a specialty care, as defined by the board, shall be supervised by a licensed physician in accordance with requirements established by the board; and (2) allow a physician assistant whose practice is primary care, as defined by the board, to collaborate with a licensed physician in accordance with requirements established by the board for different practice settings. C. A physician assistant shall be supervised by or collaborate with a licensed physician in accordance with rules adopted by the board]." - 13 -